Nebraska, session 109, LB1080.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1080 LB1080
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 25-1241, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
25-1241 (1)(a) An affidavit is a document that is signed by a person
under oath before an officer who is authorized by law to administer oaths
to persons in the place where the affidavit is signed and who verifies
the identity of the person signing the affidavit.
(b) An affidavit must contain the officer's signature, notary seal,
title, and commission expiration date. The person signing the affidavit
must do so in the physical presence of the officer or, when authorized by
law, in the online presence of the officer.
(c) An affidavit may be signed within or outside this state. The
fact that an attorney represents a party in any proceeding in any court
of this state shall not disqualify such attorney as an officer before
whom an affidavit may be signed.
(2)(a) An unsworn declaration is a document that is signed by a
person within the boundaries of the United States and contains language
substantially the same as the following: "I declare (or certify, verify,
or state) under penalty of perjury under the laws of the State of
Nebraska that everything I have stated in this document is true and
correct.".
(b) An unsworn declaration shall state (i) the date on which it was
signed and (ii) both the county or political subdivision and the state,
commonwealth, territory, or possession where it was signed.
(3) For purposes of this section, boundaries of the United States
means the geographic boundaries of the United States, Puerto Rico, the
United States Virgin Islands, and any territory or insular possession
subject to the jurisdiction of the United States. An affidavit is a
written declaration under oath, made without notice to the adverse party.
Sec. 2. Section 25-1244, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
25-1244 (1) In a civil proceeding in any court of this state, an An
-2-

LB1080 LB1080
2026 2026
affidavit may be used:
(a) To to verify a pleading; ,
(b) To to prove the service of a summons or , notice of or other
process , in an action; ,
(c) To to obtain a provisional remedy or , an examination of a
witness, a stay of proceedings; ,
(d) To support or oppose or upon a motion; , and
(e) For in any other purpose case permitted by law.
(2) An unsworn declaration may be used instead of an affidavit for
any purpose for which an affidavit may be used in a civil proceeding in
any court of this state, except:
(a) For the purpose of supporting a motion, application, or petition
for a court order without notice to the adverse party; or
(b) For a purpose for which a statute or Supreme Court rule
specifically prohibits the use of an unsworn declaration.
Sec. 3. Section 28-915, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-915 (1) A person is guilty of perjury if, in any (a) official
proceeding he or she makes a false statement under oath or equivalent
affirmation, or swears or affirms the truth of a statement previously
made, when the statement is material and he or she does not believe it to
be true or (b) official proceeding in the State of Nebraska he or she
makes a false statement under penalty of perjury in any unsworn
declaration meeting the requirements of the Uniform Unsworn Foreign
Declarations Act or section 25-1241 or 49-1808, under penalty of perjury
when the statement is material and he or she does not believe it to be
true. Perjury is a Class III felony.
(2) A person is guilty of subornation of perjury if he or she
persuades, procures, or suborns any other person to commit perjury.
Subornation of perjury is a Class III felony.
(3) A falsification shall be material, regardless of the
-3-

LB1080 LB1080
2026 2026
admissibility of the statement under rules of evidence, if it could have
affected the course or outcome of the proceeding. It shall not be a
defense that the declarant mistakenly believed the falsification to be
immaterial. Whether a falsification is material in a given factual
situation shall be a question of law.
(4) It shall not be a defense to prosecution under this section that
the oath or affirmation was administered or taken in an irregular manner
or that the declarant was not competent to make the statement. A document
purporting to be made upon oath or affirmation at any time when the actor
presents it as being so verified shall be deemed to have been duly sworn
or affirmed. A document purporting to meet the requirements of the
Uniform Unsworn Foreign Declarations Act or section 25-1241 or 49-1808
shall be deemed to have been made under penalty of perjury.
(5) No person shall be guilty of an offense under this section if he
or she retracted the falsification in the course of the proceeding in
which it was made before it became manifest that the falsification was or
would be exposed and before the falsification substantially affected the
proceeding.
(6) When the defendant made inconsistent statements under oath or
equivalent affirmation, both having been made within the period of the
statute of limitations, the prosecution may proceed by setting forth the
inconsistent statements in a single count alleging in the alternative
that one or the other was false and not believed by the defendant. In
such case it shall not be necessary for the prosecution to prove which
statement was false but only that one or the other was false and not
believed by the defendant to be true.
(7) No person shall be convicted of an offense under this section
when proof of falsity rests solely upon contradiction by testimony of a
single person other than the defendant.
Sec. 4. Section 28-915.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
-4-

LB1080 LB1080
2026 2026
28-915.01 (1) A person who makes a false statement under oath or
equivalent affirmation, or swears or affirms the truth of such a
statement previously made, or makes a false statement in an unsworn
declaration that meets the requirements of the Uniform Unsworn Foreign
Declarations Act or section 25-1241 or 49-1808, when he or she does not
believe the statement to be true, is guilty of a Class I misdemeanor if
the falsification:
(a) Occurs in an official proceeding; or
(b) Is intended to mislead a public servant in performing his or her
official function.
(2) A person who makes a false statement under oath or equivalent
affirmation, or swears or affirms the truth of such a statement
previously made, or makes a false statement in an unsworn declaration
that meets the requirements of the Uniform Unsworn Foreign Declarations
Act, when he or she does not believe the statement to be true, is guilty
of a Class II misdemeanor if the statement is one which is required by
law to be sworn or affirmed before a notary or other person authorized to
administer oaths.
(3) A person who makes a false statement in an unsworn declaration
that meets the requirements of section 25-1241 or 49-1808 and is used for
any purpose authorized by such section, when such person does not believe
the statement to be true, is guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.
(4) (3) Subsections (4) through (7) of section 28-915 shall apply to
subsections (1) through (3) and (2) of this section.
(5) (4) This section shall not apply to reports, statements,
affidavits, or other documents made or filed pursuant to the Nebraska
Political Accountability and Disclosure Act.
Sec. 5. Section 49-1808, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
49-1808 (1) For purposes of this section, statement includes any
statement, declaration, verification, certificate, oath, or affidavit.
-5-

LB1080 LB1080
2026 2026
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, Wherever
any matter that is required or permitted to be supported, evidenced,
established, or proved by the sworn written statement declaration,
verification, certificate, statement, oath, or affidavit, in writing, of
an attorney, whose signature is required by virtue of the attorney's
representation of a party in an action, making the same (other than a
deposition, an oath of office, or an oath required to be taken before a
specified official other than a notary public), such matter may, with
like force and effect, be supported, evidenced, established, or proved by
an the unsworn written statement declaration, certificate, verification,
or statement, in writing, of such attorney which: (a) Is signed is
subscribed by the attorney , as true under penalty of perjury, (b) states
the county or political subdivision and the state where it is signed, (c)
states the date on which it is signed, and (d) is dated, in substantially
the following form:
(1) If executed outside of the State of Nebraska: I declare (or
certify, verify, or state) under penalty of perjury under the laws of the
State of Nebraska that everything that I have stated in this document the
foregoing is true and correct. Executed on (date). (Signature); or
Executed on the ........ day of ............., ......., at
(date) (month) (year)
......................................,
(county or political subdivision, and state)
......................................
(printed name)
......................................
(signature)
(3) An unsworn written statement under subsection (2) of this
section shall not be used for a deposition, an oath of office, or an oath
required to be taken before a specified official other than a notary
public.
-6-

LB1080 LB1080
2026 2026
(2) If executed within the State of Nebraska: I declare under
penalty of perjury that the foregoing is true and correct. Executed on
(date). (Signature).
Sec. 6. Original sections 25-1241 and 25-1244, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, sections 28-915 and 28-915.01, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, and section 49-1808, Revised Statutes
Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
Sec. 7. The following section is outright repealed: Section
25-1245, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska.
-7-